Washington statutes.
RCW 39.35.010

Legislative finding.

The legislature hereby finds:

(1) That major publicly owned or leased facilities have a significant impact on our state's consumption of energy and emission of greenhouse gases from the buildings sector;

(2) That energy conservation practices including energy management systems, combined heat and power systems, and renewable energy systems adopted for the design, construction, and utilization of such facilities will have a beneficial effect on our overall supply of energy;

(3) That the beneficial effect of the electric output from combined heat and power systems includes both energy and capacity value;

(4) That the cost of the energy consumed by such facilities, and the greenhouse gas emissions associated with that energy consumption, over the life of the facilities shall be considered in addition to the initial cost of constructing such facilities;

(5) That the cost of energy is significant and major facility designs shall be based on the total life-cycle cost, including the initial construction cost, and the cost, over the economic life of a major facility, of the energy consumed, and of the operation and maintenance of a major facility as they affect energy consumption, including the costs associated with greenhouse gas emissions from energy consumption; and

(6) That the use of energy systems in these facilities which utilize combined heat and power or renewable resources such as solar energy, wood or wood waste, or other nonconventional fuels, and which incorporate energy management systems, shall be considered in the design of all publicly owned or leased facilities.

[ 2022 c 178 s 1; 2015 3rd sp.s. c 19 s 2; 2001 c 214 s 15; 1982 c 159 s 1; 1975 1st ex.s. c 177 s 1.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2015 3rd sp.s. c 19: "The legislature finds that it is in the public interest to encourage and foster the development of a thermal standard and to encourage combined heat and power (cogeneration) systems throughout the state. Combined heat and power systems can help the state achieve energy independence and comply with new federal electric energy emission efficiency standards by generating both electric power and useful thermal energy from a single fuel source, thereby increasing energy efficiency and decreasing grid-based emissions. It is the intent of the legislature to promote the deployment of combined heat and power by requiring consideration of combined heat and power systems in the construction of new critical governmental facilities, incorporating reports on combined heat and power facilities in integrated resource plans, and streamlining the process by which combined heat and power facilities obtain permits." [ 2015 3rd sp.s. c 19 s 1.]

Findings—2001 c 214: "(1) The legislature hereby finds that:

(a) The economy of the state and the health, safety, and welfare of its citizens are threatened by the current energy supply and price instabilities;

(b) Many energy efficiency programs for public buildings launched during the 1970s and 1980s were not maintained during the subsequent sustained period of low energy costs and abundant supply; and

(c) Conservation programs originally established in the 1970s and 1980s can be improved or updated. New programs drawing on recently developed technologies, including demand-side energy management systems, can materially increase the efficiency of energy use by the public sector.

(2) It is the policy of the state of Washington that:

(a) State government is committed to achieving significant gains in energy efficiency. Conventional conservation programs will be reviewed and updated in light of experience gained since their commencement;

(b) State government must play a leading role in demonstrating updated and new energy efficiency technologies. New programs or measures made possible by technological advances, such as demand-side response measures and energy management systems, shall be treated in the same manner as conventional conservation programs and will be integrated into the state's energy efficiency programs." [ 2001 c 214 s 14.]

Severability—Effective date—2001 c 214: See notes following RCW 80.50.010.

Applicability—1982 c 159: "This act does not apply to a major facility construction or renovation on which a life-cycle cost analysis is commenced under chapter 39.35 RCW before June 10, 1982." [ 1982 c 159 s 5.]